Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
A. Domestication

§ 17-19-1701.
Domestication of foreign corporations.

Any nonprofit corporation incorporated under the laws of any of the several states of the United States for any purpose, and so long as the corporation complies with W.S. 17-19-301(b), may become a domestic corporation of this state by delivering or causing to be delivered to the secretary of state articles of domestication. Upon filing the articles of domestication, the secretary of state shall issue to the foreign corporation a certificate of domestication which shall continue the corporation as if it had been incorporated under this act. The articles of domestication, upon being filed by the secretary of state, constitute the articles of the domesticated foreign corporation and it shall thereafter have all the powers and privileges and be subjected to all the duties and limitations granted and imposed upon domestic nonprofit corporations under the provisions of this act. A corporation does not become a resident for the purpose of W.S.

16-6-101

through

16-6-118

solely because it becomes a domestic nonprofit corporation under this section.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second and third sentences, see § 17-19-140(a)(xxxvii).

§ 17-19-1702.
Application for certificate of domestication; articles of domestication.

A foreign corporation, in order to procure a certificate of domestication shall file articles of domestication with the secretary of state, which articles shall include and set forth:

A certified copy of its original articles of incorporation and all amendments thereto or its equivalent basic corporate charter or other authorization, and a certificate of good standing not more than thirty (30) days old;

The name of the corporation and the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated;

The date of incorporation and the period of duration of the corporation;

The address of the principal office of the corporation and the jurisdiction under the laws of which it is incorporated;

The address of the proposed registered office of the corporation in this state, and the name of its proposed registered agent in this state at that address;

The purpose or purposes of the corporation which it proposes to pursue in the transaction of affairs in this state;

The names and addresses of the directors and officers of the corporation;

A statement of whether it is a public benefit corporation, a mutual benefit corporation or a religious corporation;

A statement whether the corporation has members;

A statement that the corporation accepts the constitution of this state in compliance with the requirement of article 10, section 5 of the Wyoming constitution; and

Any additional information as may be necessary or appropriate to enable the secretary of state to determine whether the corporation is entitled to a certificate of domestication evidencing its authority to transact its affairs and business in this state.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.